Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 285B.421 is amended to read:
285B.421. (1) The Levee Project Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate  and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Levee  Project Grant Fund must be credited
to the fund. The Levee Project Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited in the  fund under section
33, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited  or
transferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in
the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority to  provide grants under ORS 285B.420 for
levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) Grants from the fund for planning projects are limited to a  maximum of $2 million per ap-
plicant per biennium.
(4) Grants from the fund for construction or capital improvement projects  may not exceed an
amount equal to 80 percent of the total cost of the project.
(5) A grant may not be  awarded from the fund unless the applicant pledges matching funds to
the project of at least 20 percent of the amount of the grant.
(6) At least 60 percent of  the dollar value of grants awarded from the fund in any
biennium shall be used to provide assistance with levee projects to rural or distressed areas
as those terms are defined in ORS 285A.010.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 285B.410 is amended to read:
285B.410. As used in ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Airport” means:
(a) A runway, taxiway, aircraft parking apron, ramp, auto parking area,  access road, safety area
or runway protection zone;
(b) An airport-related facility, including a hangar, terminal, air traffic  control tower or other
building;
(c) A signal, navigational aid or traffic control system; or
(d) A fuel tank or other physical airport improvement.
(2)(a) “Community  development project” means a project that involves strategic planning,
training or other technical assistance as defined by the Oregon Business Development Department
Enrolled Senate Bill 622 (SB 622-A) Page 1
by rule, and that is aimed  at strengthening the economic development, community development or
infrastructure priority setting of a municipality or region.
(b) “Community development project” includes the following activities:
(A) Developing and managing short-term and long-term projects;
(B) Developing priorities for infrastructure projects;
(C) Strategic planning related to furthering economic or community development; or
(D) Training related  to economic or community development, including training to improve
leadership skills, technical skills or analytical skills, particularly in rural and distressed areas.
(c) “Community development project” includes projects that may  encompass a municipality or
any part of a municipality and may be undertaken in cooperation with another municipality.
(3) “Development project” means a  project for the acquisition, improvement, construction, dem-
olition, or redevelopment of municipally owned utilities, buildings, land, transportation facilities or
other facilities that  assist the economic and community development of the municipality, including
planning project activities that are necessary or useful as determined by the Oregon  Infrastructure
Finance Authority.
(4) “Direct project management costs” means expenses directly related to  a project that are
incurred by a municipality solely to support or manage a  project eligible for assistance under ORS
285B.410 to 285B.482. “Direct project management costs” does not  include routine or ongoing ex-
penses of the municipality.
(5) “Emergency project”  means a development project resulting from an emergency as defined
in ORS 401.025, to which federal disaster relief has been committed.
(6) “Energy system” means a facility necessary for the distribution,  transmission or generation
of energy, including but not limited to facilities powered by wind, solar energy or biofuel  and facil-
ities for the collection, storage,  transmission or distribution of a fuel, including natural gas, methane
or hydrogen.
(7) “Levee  project” means a community development project, development project, planning
project or other project that is associated  with [ levee] the construction, capital improvement,
inspection, accreditation, certification or repair of levees, flood  control embankments or flood
control facilities.
(8) “Marine facility” means:
(a) A wharf, dock, freight handling or passenger facility;
(b) A navigation channel or structure, including a project funded under ORS 777.267; or
(c) Any other physical marine facility improvement.
(9) “Municipality” means an Oregon  city or county, the Port of Portland created by ORS
778.010, a county  service district organized under ORS chapter 451, a district as defined in ORS
198.010, a drainage district organized under  ORS chapter 547, a tribal council of a federally recog-
nized Indian tribe in this state or an airport district organized under ORS chapter 838.
(10) “Planning project” means:
(a) A project related to a potential  development project for preliminary, final or construction
engineering;
(b) A survey, site investigation or environmental action;
(c) A financial, technical or other feasibility report, study or plan; or
(d) An activity that the authority determines to be necessary or useful in planning  for a poten-
tial development project.
(11) “Project” means a  development, community development, planning, levee or emergency
project.
(12) “Railroad” means:
(a) A main line, siding, yard, connecting or auxiliary track, right of way or easement;
(b) An industrial spur or related facility,  including a depot, shop, maintenance building or other
building;
(c) A signal or traffic control system;
(d) A bridge or tunnel;
Enrolled Senate Bill 622 (SB 622-A) Page 2
(e) A dock, pit, conveyor, bin, crane, piping system, tank or pavement for unloading,  loading or
transfer of freight, trailers or containers; or
(f) Any other physical railroad improvement.
(13) “Road” means  a street, highway or thruway or a road-related structure that provides for
continuity of a  right of way, including a bridge, tunnel, culvert or similar structure or other physical
road-related improvement.
(14) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(15) “Solid waste disposal site” has the meaning given the term “disposal site” in ORS 459.005.
(16) “Telecommunications system” means equipment or  a facility for the electronic transmission
of voice, data, text, image or video.
(17) “Transportation” means a system for movement of freight or passengers.
(18) “Utilities” means a solid waste disposal site or a water, sewage, storm  water drainage, en-
ergy or telecommunications system.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 622 (SB 622-A) Page 3